Utah statutes.
54-5-4.   Penalties.

Any person or corporation which exercises or attempts to exercise any right or privilege as any such utility during the period for which the operating rights of any such utility are suspended as provided in Section 54-5-3 is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day's violation shall constitute a separate offense. Jurisdiction of such offense shall be held to be in any county in which any part of such transaction of business occurred. Every contract made in violation of this section is unenforceable by such corporation or person.

